Washington statutes.
RCW 2.70.080

Parents for parents program—Components of program.

Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, components of the parents for parents program, provided by parent allies, may include:

(1) Outreach and support to parents at dependency-related hearings, beginning with the shelter care hearing;

(2) A class that educates parents about the dependency system they must navigate in order to have their children returned, empowers them with tools and resources they need to be successful with their case plan, and provides information that helps them understand and support the needs of their children;

(3) Ongoing individual peer support to help parents involved with the child welfare system;

(4) Structured, curriculum-based peer support groups.

[ 2020 c 33 s 5; 2015 c 117 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—2020 c 33: See note following RCW 74.13.715.

Intent—2015 c 117: See note following RCW 2.70.060.